Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-164
Central mailing room; equipment required.

The materiel division, under the direction of the Director of Administrative Services, shall operate and maintain a central mailing room. The central mailing room shall be equipped with postage metering machines and postal handling equipment for the purpose of metering official mail of the state and employ such help as may be necessary for the efficient operation of such mailing room.

Laws 1943, c. 218, § 1, p. 714;

R.S.1943, § 81-164;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 18.